Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-104
Prosecuting attorney, defined.

The term prosecuting attorney means any county attorney or city attorney or assistant city attorney when such attorney is prosecuting any violation designated as a misdemeanor or traffic infraction.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 249, p. 782;

R.S.1913, § 8904;

C.S.1922, § 9925;

C.S.1929, § 29-104;

R.S.1943, § 29-104;

Laws 1975, LB 168, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 218, § 8.

City prosecutor in a city of metropolitan class who is also a deputy county attorney is a "prosecuting attorney" within this section. State v. Kolosseus, 198 Neb. 404, 253 N.W.2d 157 (1977).

Assistant attorney general is agent of Attorney General, and official acts must be performed in name of his principal. Lower v. State, 106 Neb. 666, 184 N.W. 174 (1921).